Louisiana, session 2026, SB406.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:338.265 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§338.265. City of Slidell; hotel occupancy tax; authorization
A.(1) In addition to any other tax levied and collected, the governing
authority of the city of Slidell may levy and collect a tax upon the paid
occupancy of hotel rooms located within the city. The hotel occupancy tax shall
not exceed two percent of the rent or fee charged for such occupancy.
(2) The word "hotel" as used in this Section shall have the same
definition as that contained in R.S. 47:301(6).
(3) The person who exercises or is entitled to occupancy of the hotel room
shall pay the hotel occupancy tax at the time the rent or fee for occupancy is
paid. "Person" as used in this Paragraph shall have the same definition as that
contained in R.S. 47:301(8).
B. The governing authority shall impose the hotel occupancy tax by
ordinance. However, the ordinance imposing the tax shall be adopted by the
governing authority only after a proposition authorizing the levy of the tax has
been approved by a majority of the electors of the city voting at an election held
for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. The governing
authority may provide in the ordinance necessary and appropriate rules and
regulations for the imposition, collection, and enforcement of the hotel
occupancy tax.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 406 ENROLLED
C. The governing authority may enter into a contract with any public
entity authorized to collect sales or use taxes, under terms and conditions it
considers appropriate, including payment of a reasonable collection fee for the
collection of the hotel occupancy tax authorized by this Section. The hotel
occupancy tax shall be in addition to all taxes levied upon the occupancy of hotel
rooms located within the city.
D. Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section, the governing
authority of the city shall use the proceeds of the tax to fund the construction,
operation, and maintenance of recreational facilities in the city or other
tourism-related initiatives set forth in the proposition authorizing the levy of
such tax.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.